Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 676.750
to 676.789.
SECTION 2. (1) A person who is licensed or otherwise authorized to provide signed lan-
guage interpretation services in another  state may provide signed language interpretation
services in this state without obtaining a license from the State Board of Sign Language
Interpreters if:
(a) The person’s license or other authorization is issued by a state recognized by  the
board as acceptable to qualify the person to provide signed  language interpretation services
in this state; and
(b) If requested by the person’s employer  or entity for which the person contracts, the
person demonstrates the license or other authorization is in good standing.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a  person described in this section from applying for
a license under ORS 676.750 to 676.789.
(3) The board may  adopt rules to carry out this section. The board may not require a
person described in this section to submit any information or pay a fee to the board in order
to provide signed language interpretation services as allowed by this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Health Licensing Office may issue  a sign language interpreter-in-
training license to an applicant who:
(a) Is at least 18 years of age;
(b) Demonstrates compliance with the code of professional conduct authored by the
Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf, or its successor organization, and the National Asso-
ciation of the Deaf, or its successor organization, and  approved by the State Board of Sign
Language Interpreters;
(c) Meets the requirements established  by the board relating to minimum qualifications,
education or training or any combination thereof;
(d) Meets any other requirements established by the board; and
(e) Pays  a fee established by the board. The fees established under this paragraph may
not, together with other fees collected under ORS  676.750 to 676.789, exceed the cost of ad-
ministering ORS 676.750 to 676.789.
Enrolled Senate Bill 950 (SB 950-A) Page 1
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 676.572, the board may determine whether a license issued un-
der this section may be renewed on a case by case basis.
(3)(a) A licensed sign language interpreter-in-training may provide signed  language in-
terpretation services only under the direct, in-person supervision of  a licensed supervisory
sign language interpreter or a licensed sign language interpreter.
(b) A licensed supervisory sign language interpreter or licensed  sign language interpreter
who supervises a licensed sign language interpreter-in-training is responsible for the  signed
language services provided by the licensed sign language interpreter-in-training.
SECTION 4.  ORS 676.753 is amended to read:
676.753. (1) The Health Licensing Office may issue a  supervisory sign language interpreter li-
cense to an applicant who:
(a) Is at least 18 years of age;
(b) Demonstrates compliance with  the code of professional conduct authored by the Registry of
Interpreters for the Deaf, or  its successor organization, and the National Association of the Deaf,
or its successor organization, and approved by the State Board of Sign Language Interpreters;
(c) Has at least three years of qualifying experience, as determined by the board;
(d) Meets the requirements established by the board relating to  minimum qualifications, educa-
tion or training or any combination thereof;
(e) Meets any other requirements established by the board; and
(f) Pays a fee established by the [ office] board. The fees established under this  paragraph
may not, together with other  fees collected under ORS 676.750 to 676.789, exceed the cost of
administering ORS 676.750 to 676.789.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 676.572, a license issued under this section may be  renewed ev-
ery three years.
[(2)] (3) A licensed supervisory sign language interpreter[ :]
[(a) May not provide signed language interpretation services  in a legal or medical setting without
a license issued under ORS 676.765 or 676.768. ]
[(b)] may supervise licensed provisional sign language interpreters  and licensed sign language
interpreters-in-training.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 676.756 is amended to read:
676.756. (1) The Health Licensing Office may  issue a sign language interpreter license to an
applicant who:
(a) Is at least 18 years of age;
(b) Demonstrates compliance with  the code of professional conduct authored by the Registry of
Interpreters for the Deaf, or  its successor organization, and the National Association of the Deaf,
or its successor organization, and approved by the State Board of Sign Language Interpreters;
(c) Meets the requirements established by the board relating to minimum  qualifications, educa-
tion or training or any combination thereof;
(d) Meets any other requirements established by the board; and
(e) Pays a fee established by  the [ office] board. The fees established under this paragraph
may not, together with other  fees collected under ORS 676.750 to 676.789, exceed the cost of
administering ORS 676.750 to 676.789.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 676.572, a license issued under this  section may be renewed [ twice]
every three years .
(3) A licensed sign language interpreter may [ not provide signed language interpretation  services
in a legal or medical setting without a license issued under ORS 676.765  or 676.768 ] supervise li-
censed sign language interpreters-in-training .
SECTION 6.
 ORS 676.759 is amended to read:
676.759. (1)  The Health Licensing Office may issue a provisional sign language interpreter li-
cense to an applicant who:
(a) Is at least 18 years of age;
Enrolled Senate Bill 950 (SB 950-A) Page 2
(b) Demonstrates compliance with  the code of professional conduct authored by the Registry of
Interpreters for the Deaf, or  its successor organization, and the National Association of the Deaf,
or its successor organization, and approved by the State Board of Sign Language Interpreters;
(c) Meets the requirements established by the board relating to minimum  qualifications, educa-
tion or training or any combination thereof;
(d) Meets any other requirements established by the board; and
(e) Pays a fee established by  the [ office] board. The fees established under this paragraph
may not, together with other  fees collected under ORS 676.750 to 676.789, exceed the cost of
administering ORS 676.750 to 676.789.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 676.572, a license issued under this section may be renewed [ up to
five times ] every three years, but not more than twice .
(3) A licensed provisional sign language interpreter[ :]
[(a)] may provide signed language  interpretation services only under the supervision of a li-
censed supervisory sign language interpreter. The supervision may include supervision by re-
mote means and need not be in real time.
[(b) May not provide signed language  interpretation services in an educational, legal or medical
setting without a license issued under section ORS 676.762, 676.765 or 676.768. ]
SECTION 7.
 ORS 676.771 is amended to read:
676.771. (1)(a) Except  as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection  and section 2 of this 2025
Act, a person who is not  licensed under ORS 676.750 to 676.789 may not provide signed language
interpretation services.
(b) A person  who is not licensed under ORS 676.750 to 676.789 may provide signed language
interpretation services:
(A) In circumstances in which a license issued under ORS 676.750 to 676.789 is not required.
(B) In emergency situations involving imminent or immediate harm  and during which a licensee
is not available.
(C) In other extenuating circumstances, as determined by the State Board of Sign Language In-
terpreters.
(D) If the person is a qualified interpreter under ORS  45.288 or a court interpreter certified
under ORS 45.291 providing signed language interpretation services  for the purpose of a proceeding
in the  Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, Oregon Tax Court or a circuit court or at the direction
or with the approval of the Chief Justice of the Supreme  Court or the presiding judge of the court
in which the proceeding occurs.
(E) On a temporary basis not to exceed the number of days in a calendar year determined
by the board if  the person is authorized in another state or jurisdiction or otherwise quali-
fied, as determined by the board, to provide signed language interpretation services.
(2) A person who is not licensed under  ORS 676.750 to 676.789 may not assume or use any title,
words, abbreviations, signs or insignias, including but not  limited to the titles “licensed supervisory
sign language interpreter,” “licensed sign language interpreter,” “licensed provisional sign  language
interpreter[ ,]” [ “licensed educational sign language interpreter,” “licensed legal sign  language inter-
preter” or “licensed medical sign language  interpreter,” ] or “licensed sign language interpreter-
in-training,”  that indicate that the person is licensed to provide signed language  interpretation
services under ORS 676.750 to 676.789.
(3) For the purpose of providing signed language interpretation services,  a person may not em-
ploy or contract with an individual who is not licensed to provide  signed language interpretation
services under ORS 676.750 to 676.789.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 676.783 is amended to read:
676.783. The State Board of Sign Language Interpreters:
(1) Shall advise the Health Licensing Office in the establishment of:
(a) A publicly available  registry of licensees that includes at least the names and specific license
of each licensee.
Enrolled Senate Bill 950 (SB 950-A) Page 3
(b) A process to receive and address grievances regarding licensees  and signed language inter-
pretation services.
(2) Shall adopt rules to carry out ORS 676.750 to 676.789, including rules to:
(a) Establish standards relating to minimum qualifications, education or training or  any combi-
nation thereof for issuance of licenses under ORS 676.750 to 676.789;
(b) Determine qualifications for renewal of licenses issued under ORS 676.750 to 676.789;
(c) Establish supervision requirements; [ and]
(d) Establish a code of professional conduct for sign language interpreters licensed under  ORS
676.750 to 676.789[.]; and
(e) Notwithstanding ORS 676.576, establish fees for the issuance and renewal of licenses
under ORS 676.750 to 676.789. In establishing fees, the board shall consider:
(A) The funding requirements of the office as related to carrying out the office’s duties
under ORS 676.750 to 676.789; and
(B) The national averages for similar fees.
(3) May establish additional  specialty licenses for sign language interpreters that the board de-
termines necessary.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 676.786 is amended to read:
676.786. The Health Licensing Office [ and Department of Education  may ] shall adopt rules with
the advice of the State Board  of Sign Language Interpreters to carry out the office’s [ and the
department’s] duties under ORS 676.750 to 676.789.
SECTION 10. ORS 676.762, 676.765 and 676.768 are repealed.
SECTION 11. A license issued under ORS 676.762, 676.765 and 676.768 before the operative
date specified in section 12 of this 2025 Act is valid until January 1,  2029. The holder of a li-
cense issued under  ORS 676.762, 676.765 and 676.768 may, on and after the operative date
specified in section 12  of this 2025 Act, provide signed language interpretation services in
settings determined by the State Board of Sign Language Interpreters.
SECTION 12. (1) Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2025 Act, the amendments to ORS 676.753,
676.756, 676.759, 676.771, 676.783 and 676.786 by sections 4 to 9 of this 2025 Act and the  repeal
of ORS 676.762, 676.765 and 676.768 by section 10 of this 2025 Act become operative on January
1, 2026.
(2) The Health Licensing Office and the State Board of Sign  Language Interpreters may
take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section that is
necessary for the office and the board to exercise, on and after  the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers  conferred on the of-
fice and the board by sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act, the amendments to ORS  676.753,
676.756, 676.759, 676.771, 676.783 and 676.786 by sections 4 to 9 of this 2025 Act and the  repeal
of ORS 676.762, 676.765 and 676.768 by section 10 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 13. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 950 (SB 950-A) Page 4
Passed by Senate April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 950 (SB 950-A) Page 5